en: Marrowfat peas, Field beans, Kapucijner peas
ca: Tirabec
es: Bisalto, Tirabeque
fr: Pois des champs
hr: Poljski grah
la: Pisum sativum arvense, Pisum sativum subsp. arvense
nl: Kapucijners, Velderwten
pl: Groch zwyczajny polny
sv: Gråärt

en: Pinto beans
de: Pintobohnen, Wachtelbohnen
es: Alubias pintas, Judías pintas
fr: Haricots pinto
hr: Pinto grah
it: fagioli Pinto
ja: うずら豆
nl: Pintobonen, Kievitsbonen
pl: Fasola pinto
sv: Pintobönor

it: Fagioli borlotti
nl: Borlotti bonen

en: Red beans, Red kidney beans
bg: Червен боб
de: Rote Bohnen, Rote Kidneybohnen
es: Alubias rojas, Judías rojas, Alubias rojas de riñón, Judías rojas de riñón
fi: Kidneypavut
fr: Haricots rouges
hr: Crveni grah
hu: Vörösbab
it: Fagioli rossi
ja: 赤インゲン豆, 赤いんげん豆, キドニービーンズ
nl: Rode bonen, Rode kidneybonen, Rode kidney bonen, Nierbonen
pl: Fasola czerwona
pt: Feijões vermelhos
ru: Красная фасоль

en: Dried red kidney beans
fr: Haricots rouges secs

en: White beans
bg: Бял боб
ca: Fesols blanques, Mongetes blanques
de: Weiße Bohnen
es: Alubias blancas, Judías blancas
fi: valkoiset pavut
fr: Haricots blancs
hr: Bijeli grah
hu: Fehér babok
it: Fagioli bianchi
ja: 白インゲン豆, 白いんげん豆
nl: Witte bonen
pl: Fasola biała
pt: Feijões brancos
ru: Белая фасоль

en: Cooked haricot beans
fr: Haricots blancs cuits

en: Cooked white beans in tomato sauce
nl: Gekookte witte bonen in tomatensaus

en: Dried haricot beans, Dry haricot beans
bg: Суров бял боб
fr: Haricots blancs secs
hr: Suhe mahune

en: White kidney beans
de: Weiße Kidneybohnen
es: Alubias blancas de riñón, Judías blancas de riñón
hr: Cannellini grah
it: Fagioli cannellini, Cannellini
nl: Witte nierbonen

en: Coco white beans
es: Alubias blancas redondas, Judías blancas redondas
fr: Haricots cocos blancs, Haricots cocos
hr: Koko bijeli grah
nl: Cocobonen

en: Dermason beans
fr: Haricots Dermason

en: Canned coco white beans
fr: Haricots cocos blancs en conserve, Haricots cocos en conserve

en: Canela beans
es: Alubias canela, Judías canela

en: Cowpeas
de: Augenbohnen
es: Judías carilla
hr: Kravlji grašak
ja: ササゲ
la: Vigna unguiculata
nl: Koeienerwten, Ogenbonen

en: Black-eyed peas, Black-eyed beans
fr: Cornilles
hr: Crnooki grašak
la: Vigna unguiculata subsp. unguiculata

en: Hyacinth beans, Lablab
es: Judías de Egipto, Porotos de Egipto
fr: Pois antaque, Dolique d'Égypte, Lablab
hr: Zumbul bobe
la: Lablab purpureus, Dolichos lablab

en: Lentils, Masoor dal, Masur dal
bg: Леща
ca: Llenties
de: Linsen
es: Lentejas
fi: linssit
fr: Lentilles, Lentilles cultivées, Lentilles à cuire
he: עדשים
hr: Leća
it: Lenticchie
ja: レンズマメ
la: Lens culinaris
nl: Linzen
pl: Soczewica
pt: Lentilhas, lentilha
ru: Чечевица
sv: Linser, lins
tr: Mercimek

en: Dried lentils
bg: Сурова леща
de: Getrocknete Linsen
fr: Lentilles sèches
hr: Sušena leća
nl: Gedroogde linzen
pl: Soczewica suszona, Soczewica sucha

en: Cooked lentils
es: Lentejas cocidas
fr: Lentilles cuites
hr: Kuhana leća
pl: Soczewica gotowana